Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.330

Discharge of jury without verdict.

The jury may be discharged by the court on account of the sickness of a juror, or other accident or calamity requiring their discharge, or by consent of both parties, or after they have been kept together until it satisfactorily appears that there is no probability of their agreeing.

[Code 1881 s 233; 1877 p 48 s 237; 1869 p 58 s 237; RRS s 353.]